Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Linked Deposit Investment Program

41.600.
Definitions for KRS 41.600 to 41.625 — Eligibility requirements. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 276, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 208, § 4, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 172, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2004, ch. 41, § 1, effective July 13, 2004; repealed by 2019 ch. 125, § 5, effective June 27, 2019.

41.605.
Authorized investment — Limitations — Annual report — Authority for administrative regulations. [Repealed.]

41.606.
Linked deposit investment program — Purpose — Reports — Authority for administrative regulations. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 208, § 5, effective July 15, 1996; 2004, ch. 41, § 2, effective July 13, 2004; repealed by 2019 ch. 125, § 5, effective June 27, 2019.

41.610.
Participation in program — Investment agreements — Required terms and conditions. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 276, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 208, § 6, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 172, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2004, ch. 41, § 3, effective July 13, 2004; repealed by 2019 ch. 125, § 5, effective June 27, 2019.

41.615.
Use of moneys obtained — Refinancing of prior loans. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 276, § 4, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 208, § 7, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 172, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; repealed by 2019 ch. 125, § 5, effective June 27, 2019.

41.620.
Application for linked deposit loan — Effect of false statement. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 276, § 5, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 208, § 8, effective July 15, 1996; repealed by 2019 ch. 125, § 5, effective June 27, 2019.

41.625.
Monitoring — Administrative support — Authority for administrative regulations. [Repealed.]